New York, session 2025-2026, A8694.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraph (i) of paragraph (c) of subdivision 2 of 2 section 2808-f of the public health law, as added by chapter 637 of the 3 laws of 2024, is amended to read as follows: 4 (i) is a nonprofit corporation that operates one hundred ten adult 5 beds licensed under article sixteen of [this chapter] the mental hygiene 6 law; or 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall be deemed to 8 have been in full force and effect on and after December 21, 2024. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13245-01-5